Utah statutes.
67-19e-107.   Complaints.

(1)  A complaint against an administrative law judge shall be filed with the department.

(2)  Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall conduct an investigation.

(3)  If the department's investigation determines that the complaint is frivolous or without merit, it may dismiss it without further action.  A complaint that merely indicates disagreement, without further misconduct, with the administrative law judge's decision shall be treated as without merit.

(4)  The contents of all complaints and subsequent investigations are classified as protected under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

